sv: Kompatibelt mässingsinstrument: Althorn; Barytonhorn; Bastrombon; Bygelhorn; Kornett; Eufonium; Flygelhorn; Valthorn; Mellofon; Piccolotrumpet; Sousafon; Tenorhorn; Trombon; Trumpet; Tuba; Wagnertuba; Övrigt
tr: Uyumlu pirinç enstrüman: Alto boru; Bariton boru; Bas trombonu; Boru çalgı; Kornet; Euphonium; flugelhorn; Fransız kornosu; Mellofon; Pikolo trompet; Suzafon; Alto korno; Trombon; Trompet; Tuba; Wagner tuba; Diğer
sl-SI: Združljivo trobilo: Altovski rog; Baritonski rog; Bas pozavna; Bugle; Kornet; Evfonij; Flugel rog; Francoski rog; Melofon; Piccolo trobenta; Suzafon; Tenorski rog; Pozavna; Trobenta; Tuba; Wagnerjeva tuba; Drugo
pt-PT: Instrumento de latão compatível: Saxotrompa alto; Saxotrompa barítono; Trombone baixo; Cornetim; Corneta; Eufónio; Fliscorne; Trompa francesa; Melofone; Trompete piccolo; Sousafone; Saxotrompa tenor; Trombone; Trompete; Tuba; Tuba Wagner; Outro
pt-BR: Compatível com instrumento de metal: Tuba; Barítono; Trombone baixo; Cornetim; Corneta; Eufônio; Fliscorne; Trompa; Melofone; Trompete flautim; Sousafone; Trompa alta; Trombone; Trompete; Tuba; Trompa wagneriana; Outro
da: Kompatibel messinginstrument: Althorn; Barytonhorn; Bastrombon; Signalhorn; Kornet; Eufonium; Flugelhorn; Alpehorn; Mellofon; Piccolotrompet; Sousafon; Tenorhorn; Basun; Trompet; Tuba; Wagnertuba; Andet
fr: Instrument de cuivre compatible: Cor alto; Cor baryton; Trombone basse; Bugle; Cornet; Euphonium; Cor de bugle; Cor d’harmonie; Mellophone; Trompette piccolo; Sousaphone; Cor ténor; Trombone; Trompette; Tuba; Tuba wagnérien; Autre
it: Strumento in ottone compatibile: Corno contralto; Corno baritono; Trombone basso; Corno; Cornetta; Eufonio; Flicorno soprano; Corno a pistone; Mellofono; Tromba ottavina; Sousafono; Corno tenore; Trombone; Tromba; Tuba; Tuba wagneriana; Altro
ja: 使用可能な金管楽器: アルトホルン; バリトンホルン; バストロンボーン; ビューグル; コルネット; ユーフォニアム; フリューゲルホルン; フレンチホルン; メロフォン; ピッコロトランペット; スーザフォン; テナーホルン; トロンボーン; トランペット; チューバ; ワーグナーチューバ; その他
th: เครื่องดนตรีทองเหลืองที่เข้ากันได้: แตรอัลโต; แตรบาริโทน; เบสทรอมโบน; แตรเดี่ยว; คอร์เน็ต; ยูโฟเนียม; ฟลูเกิลฮอร์น; เฟรนช์ฮอร์น; เมลโลโฟน; ปิกโคโลทรัมเป็ต; ซูซาโฟน; เทเนอร์ฮอร์น; ทรอมโบน; Trumpet; ทูบา; วากเนอร์ทูบา; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kompatibilno limeno puhačko glazbalo: Alt-rog; Bariton-rog; Bas-trombon; Vojnička truba; Kornet; Eufonij; Krilnica; Francuski rog; Melofon; Piccolo truba; Suzafon; Tenorski rog; Trombon; Truba; Tuba; Wagnerova tuba; Ostalo
fi: Yhteensopiva vaskipuhallin: Alttotorvi; Baritonitorvi; Bassopasuuna; Metsästystorvi; Kornetti; Baritonitorvi; Flyygelitorvi; Yksinkertainen käyrätorvi; Mellofoni; Piccolotrumpetti; Sousafoni; Tenoritorvi; Pasuuna; Trumpetti; Tuuba; Wagner-tuuba; Muu
nl: Compatibel koperinstrument: Alt; Bariton; Bastrombone; Klaroen; Kornet; Euphonium; Bugel; Hoorn; Mellofoon; Piccolotrompet; Sousafoon; Tenorhoorn; Trombone; Trompet; Tuba; Wagner-tuba; Andere
ru: Совместимый медный духовой инструмент: Альтгорн; Баритон-горн; Бас-тромбон; Горн; Корнет; Эуфониум; Флюгель-горн; Валторна; Меллофон; Труба-пикколо; Сузафон; Тенор-горн; Тромбон; Труба; Туба; Туба Вагнера; Другое
lt-LT: Suderinamas varinis pučiamasis instrumentas: Althornas; Baritono ragas; Bosinis trombonas; Trimitas; Kornetas; Eufonija; Fliugelhornas; Valtorna; Melofonas; Pikolo trimitas; Suzafonas; Tenoro ragas; Trombonas; Trimitas; Tuba; Vagnerio tūba; Kita
zh-TW: 相容的銅管樂器: 中音號; 細管上低音號; 低音長號; 軍號; 短號; 粗管上低音號; 柔音號; 法國號; 中音圓號; 高音小號; 蘇沙號; 次中音號; 長號; 小號; 低音號; 華格納低音號; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместим духов инструмент: Алт валдхорна; Баритон валдхорна; Бас тромбон; Ловджийски рог; Корнет; Еуфониум; Флигорна; Френска валдхорна; Мелофон; Пиколо тромпет; Сусафон; Тенор валдхорна; Тромбон; Тромпет; Туба; Вагнерова туба; Други
sk-SK: Kompatibilný dychový nástroj: Altový roh; Barytónový roh; Basový trombón; Poľnica; Kornet; Eufónium; Krídlovka; Lesný roh; Melafón; Piccolo trúbka; Sousafón; Tenorový roh; Trombón; Trúbka; Tuba; Wagnerova tuba; Iné
vi: Dụng cụ ống lót tương thích: Kèn Alto; Kèn Baritone; Kèn Bass trombone; Kèn Bugle; Kèn cocnê; Tuba; Kèn Flugel; Kèn săn; Kèn Mellophone; Kèn piccolo; Kèn sousa; Kèn tenor; Kèn trombone; Kèn trumpet; Kèn tuba; Kèn Tuba wagner; Khác
cs: Kompatibilní žesťový nástroj: Altový lesní roh; Barytonový lesní roh; Basový trombon; Trubka; Kornet; Eufonyum; Křídlovka; Lesní roh; Melofon; Malá trumpetka; Suzafon; Tenorový roh; Pozoun; Trubka; Tuba; Wagnerova tuba; Jiné
es: Instrumento de metal compatible: Cuerno alto; Cuerno barítono; Trombón bajo; Corneta natural; Corneta; Eufonio; Cuerno de flugel; Corno francés; Melófono; Trompeta piccolo; Sousafono; Cuerno tenor; Trombón; Trompeta; Tuba; Tuba wagner; Otros
zh-CN: 兼容铜管乐器: 中音号; 上低音号; 低音长号; 军号; 短号; 上低音号; 富鲁格号; 圆号; 行进圆号; 高音小号; 苏萨大号; 次中音号; 长号; 喇叭裙; 低音兼次中音大号; 瓦格纳大号; 其他
el: Συμβατό χάλκινο πνευστό μουσικό όργανο: Αλτικόρνο; Βαθύφωνο κόρνο; Μπάσο τρομπόνι; Σάλπιγγα; Κορνέτα; Ευφώνιο; Οξύφωνο κόρνο; Γαλλικό κόρνο; Μελόφωνο; Τρομπέτα Piccolo; Σουζάφωνο; Υψίφωνο κόρνο; Τρομπόνι; Τρομπέτα; Τούμπα; Τούμπα Wagner; Άλλο
ko: 호환 가능한 금관 악기: 알토 호른; 바리톤 호른; 베이스 트롬본; 나팔; 코넷; 유포니엄; 플뤼겔호른; 프렌치 호른; 멜로폰; 피콜로 트럼펫; 수자폰; 테너 호른; 트롬본; 트럼펫; 튜바; 바그너 튜바; 기타
ro-RO: Alămuri compatibile: Corn alto; Corn bariton; Trombon bas; Goarnă; Cornet; Eufoniu; Fligorn; Corn francez; Melofon; Trompetă piccolo; Susafon; Corn tenor; Trombon; Trompetă; Tubă; Tubă wagner; Altele
hu: Kompatibilis rézfúvós hangszer: Altkürt; Baritonkürt; Basszusharsona; Kürt; Kornett; Baritontuba; Szárnykürt; Francia kürt; Mellofon; Pikoló trombita; Szouszafon; Tenorkürt; Harsona; Trombita; Tuba; Wagner-tuba; Egyéb
en: Compatible brass instrument: Alto horn; Baritone horn; Bass trombone; Bugle; Cornet; Euphonium; Flugel horn; French horn; Mellophone; Piccolo trumpet; Sousaphone; Tenor horn; Trombone; Trumpet; Tuba; Wagner tuba; Other
pl: Kompatybilny instrument dęty blaszany: Róg altowy; Róg barytonowy; Puzon basowy; Dąbrówka; Kornet; Eufonium; Róg flugla; Waltornia; Melofon; Trąbka piccolo; Suzafon; Róg tenorowy; Puzon; Trąbka; Tuba; Tuba Wagnera; Inne
de: Kompatibles Blechblasinstrument: Althorn; Baritonhorn; Bassposaune; Horn; Kornett; Euphonium; Flügelhorn; Waldhorn; Mellophon; Piccolo-Trompete; Sousaphon; Tenorhorn; Posaune; Trumpet; Tuba; Wagner-Tuba; Sonstiges
nb: Kompatibelt messinginstrument: Althorn; Baritonhorn; Basstrombone; Bugle; Kornett; Eufonium; Flugelhorn; Valthorn; Mellofon; Piccolotrompet; Sousafon; Tenorhorn; Trombone; Trompet; Tuba; Wagner-tuba; Annet